Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Issuance of injunction to prevent nuisance, §

41-2-4

.

23-2-1.
When equity will set aside judgment.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1986, p. 294, § 3, effective March 26, 1986.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Orig. Code 1863, § 3062; Code 1868, § 3074; Code 1873, § 3129; Code 1882, § 3129; Civil Code 1895, § 3988; Civil Code 1910, § 4585; Code 1933, § 37-220.

23-2-2.
Setting aside sale or contract for inadequate consideration.

Great inadequacy of consideration, joined with great disparity of mental ability in contracting a bargain, may justify equity in setting aside a sale or other contract.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3110; Code 1868, § 3122; Code 1873, § 3179; Code 1882, § 3179; Civil Code 1895, § 4033; Civil Code 1910, § 4630; Code 1933, § 37-710.

Cross references.

For further provisions regarding inadequacy of consideration, see §

13-3-46

.

Law reviews.

For article discussing effect of contracts involving fraud or inadequate consideration, see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 469 (1970).

23-2-3.
Payment of lost bonds or notes.

In cases of lost bonds or negotiable securities, the court may decree that payment shall be made, provided indemnity is given against liability or loss resulting from such payment.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3046; Code 1868, § 3058; Code 1873, § 3113; Code 1882, § 3113; Civil Code 1895, § 3969; Civil Code 1910, § 4566; Code 1933, § 37-214.

Law reviews.

For note, the voluntary-payment doctrine in Georgia, see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 893 (1982).